Maryland, session 2026, HB0611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–404.
(a) There is a Class B–MB/22 license in the county.
(e) The annual license fee is [$1,090] $1,200.
26–601.
(a) There is a Class A beer license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$500] $550.
26–602.
(a) There is a Class B beer license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$365] $550.
26–603.
(a) There is a Class C beer license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$245] $550.
26–604.
(a) There is a Class D beer license.

HOUSE BILL 611 3
(d) The annual license fee is [$500] $550.
26–701.
(a) There is a Class A light wine license in the county.
(d) The annual license fee is [$50] $60.
26–801.
(a) There is a Class A beer and light wine license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$500] $550.
26–802.
(a) There is a Class B beer and light wine license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$365] $550.
26–803.
(a) There is a Class C beer and light wine license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$245] $550.
26–804.
(a) There is a Class D beer and light wine license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$500] $550.
26–901.
(a) There is a Class A beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$910] $1,000.
26–902.
(a) There is a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license.
(f) The annual license fee is [$2,305] $2,540.
26–903.

HOUSE BILL 611
(a) There is a Class B–Plus beer, wine, and liquor license.
(g) The annual license fee is [$3,270] $3,600.
26–904.
(a) There is a Class BH (hotel) license.
(g) The annual license fee is [$5,000] $5,500.
26–1001.
(a) There is a Class B–AE (arts and entertainment) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$3,600] $3,960.
26–1001.1.
(b) There is a Class B–CAEVC (College Athletic Event Venue Concessionaire)
beer, wine, and liquor license.
(i) (1) The annual fee for the license is [$3,500] $3,850.
26–1002.
(a) There is a Class C (concessionaire) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(e) The annual license fee is [$1,815] $2,000.
26–1003.
(a) There is a Class B–CC (convention center) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(g) The annual license fee is [$22,000] $24,200.
26–1004.
(a) There is a Class C (country club) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(f) The annual license fee is [$1,100] $1,210.
26–1005.
(a) There is a Class C (country and golf club) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(f) The annual license fee is [$1,815] $2,000.

HOUSE BILL 611 5
26–1006.
(a) There is a Class B–CI license.
(i) The annual license fee is [$2,365] $2,600.
26–1007.
(b) This section applies only in the City of Greenbelt.
(c) There is a Class B–DH (drafthouse) license.
(h) (1) The annual license fee is [$245] $270.
26–1008.
(a) There is a Class B/ECF (educational conference facility) beer, wine, and liquor
license for the University College Center for Adult Education of the University of Maryland.
(g) The annual license fee is [$5,175] $5,690.
26–1009.
(a) There is a Class B–ECF/DS (Education Conference Facility/Dining Service)
beer, wine, and liquor license.
(h) The annual license fee is [$8,275] $9,100.
26–1009.1.
(b) There is an entertainment concessionaire license.
(h) (1) The annual fee for the license is [$5,000] $5,500.
26–1009.2.
(b) There is an entertainment facility license.
(h) (1) The annual fee for the license is [$22,000] $24,200.
26–1010.
(b) There is a Class B–ECR (Equestrian Center restaurant) beer, wine, and liquor
license.

HOUSE BILL 611
(g) The annual license fee is [$2,420] $2,660.
26–1011.
(b) There is a Class C (fraternal/sororal/service organization) beer, wine, and
liquor license.
(g) The annual license fee is [$910] $1,000.
26–1012.
(b) There is a Class B–GC (golf course) beer, wine, and liquor license for use on
the licensed premises of a golf course in the county under the jurisdiction of the
Commission.
(f) The annual license fee is [$500] $550.
26–1013.
(a) There is a B–RT (racetrack) license.
(e) The license fee is [$60] $70 per day for each day the license is used.
26–1014.
(a) There is a Class B–Stadium (baseball stadium) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(e) The annual license fee is [$2,420] $3,600.
26–1015.
(a) There is a Class B–Stadium (football stadium) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(c) The annual license fee is [$21,780] $24,000.
26–1016.
(b) There is a Class B–TP (theme park) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(f) The annual license fee is [$4,290] $4,720.
26–1017.
(a) There is a Class C (veterans’ organization or club) beer, wine, and liquor
license.

HOUSE BILL 611 7
(e) The annual license fee is [$910] $1,000.
26–1018.
(a) There is a Class D (waterfront) beer and wine license.
(e) The annual license fee is [$660] $685.
26–1018.1.
(a) There is a Class B–WPL (waterfront pavilion) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(k) The monthly license fee is [$500] $525.
26–1019.
(a) There is a Class C (yacht club) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(g) The annual license fee is [$1,575] $1,730.
26–1103.
(b) There is an entertainment permit.
(n) The annual fee for the permit is [$1,500] $1,650, which is in addition to the
annual fee for the Class B license.
26–1103.1.
(a) There is a family entertainment permit.
(g) The annual fee for the permit is [$250] $275, which is in addition to the
annual fee for the Class B license.
26–1104.
(a) There is a Sunday off–sale permit.
(g) (1) The application fee for the permit is $750.
(2) The annual fees for the permit are:
(i) [$2,590] $2,850 for the holder of a Class A license; and
(ii) [$1,080] $1,190 for the holder of a Class B license with an
off–sale privilege.

HOUSE BILL 611
(3) The fees listed in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection are in
addition to the annual fee for the Class A license or Class B license to which it is attached.
26–1201.
(a) There is a Class BCE (on–sale) beer, wine, and liquor license.
(d) The annual license fee is [$4,480] $4,930.
26–1306.
(a) There is a wine tasting license.
(e) In addition to the cost of the beer and wine license or beer, wine, and liquor
license, the annual license fee is [$120] $130.
26–1314.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for a Class C per
diem beer license and a Class C per diem beer and wine license, the fee is [$75] $100 per
day.
(2) (i) For a club holding a gaming event, the fee is [$100] $125 per
day.
(3) For a Class D (3–day) beer and wine license, the fee is [$100] $125 per
day.
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, for a Class C per
diem beer, wine, and liquor license, the fee is [$200] $225 per day.
(2) (i) For a club holding a gaming event, the fee is [$150] $175 per
day.
(3) For a Class C (3–day) beer, wine, and liquor license, the fee is [$200]
$225 per day.
26–1409.
(a) The Board shall charge an application fee for a new license.
(c) The application fee is [$300] $400 and in addition to any other fee required
for a license.
26–1602.

HOUSE BILL 611 9
(b) (1) The Board may approve the transfer of one Class B beer, wine, and
liquor license with an off–sale privilege for use in Hyattsville.
(2) The annual fee for a license transferred under paragraph (1) of this
subsection is [$1,500] $1,650.
26–1612.
(h) The annual license fee for a Class B license obtained under this section is
[$2,500] $2,750.
26–1613.
(a) There is a Class B–DD (Development District) 7–day beer, wine, and liquor
license.
(h) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the annual
license fee is [$3,025] $3,330.
(2) The annual license fee for a license with an off–sale privilege issued
under subsection (c)(3) of this section is [$5,000] $5,500.
26–1616.
(a) There is a Class BLX license.
(i) The annual license fee is [$3,875] $4,265.
26–1617.
(a) There is a Class B–RD (revitalization district) license.
(e) The annual license fee is [$725] $800.
26–1706.
The fee for a transfer of a license is [$500] $550.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.